Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 95, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 95. A. Any Except as provided in subsection F of this
section, any person convicted of an offense against the laws of this
state and sentenced to imprisonment that is not to be served in a
county jail shall be transported by the sheriff of the county where
the person is sentenced, or transported by a designated
representative of the sheriff, to the Department of Corrections at

SB2062 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the Lexington Assessment and Reception Center or other location
designated by the Director of the Department of Corrections.
B. Any Except as provided in subsection F of this section, any
person convicted of an offense against the laws of this state and
sentenced to imprisonment that is not to be served in a county jail
and who is not housed in a county jail shall be transported by the
detention center, or transported by a designated representative of
the detention center, to the Department of Corrections at the
Lexington Assessment and Reception Center or other location
designated by the Director of the Department of Corrections.
C. The sheriff shall deliver the person to the Department at
such center together with:
1. A certified copy of the judgment and sentence from the court
ordering such imprisonment, unless the judgment and sentence
previously has been sent electronically by an authorized clerk of
the court;
2. A certificate setting forth the number of days served in the
county jail after the pronouncement of judgment and rendering of
sentence for the offenses committed;
3. A copy of any medical, dental, or mental health records of
the defendant for conditions reviewed or treated while in the
custody of the sheriff;


SB2062 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. Any medication or medical or dental device prescribed for
the defendant while in the custody of the sheriff or for a
preexisting condition; and
5. A copy of the presentence investigation report, if a report
was prepared.
D. The Department of Corrections shall give the sheriff a
receipt for each person received into the custody of the Department.
The receipt shall be filed by the sheriff in the office of the clerk
of the court where the sentence was made.
E. The Department of Corrections shall reimburse the
transporting agency as follows:
1. Mileage from the county sheriff’s office to the appropriate
reception center and back to the county sheriff’s office; and
2. Hourly wage reimbursement for the transporting officer for
the hours of transport travel and time spent at the reception center
based on the transporting officer’s normal hourly wage.
Reimbursement shall not exceed Thirty Dollars ($30.00) an hour per
officer. Documentation of the officer’s hourly wage shall accompany
all reimbursement requests to the Department.
The Department of Corrections shall have the authority to
promulgate rules and forms for the reimbursement procedures provided
in this section.


SB2062 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The Department of Corrections shall submit a quarterly report to
the Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee and Chair of the
House of Representatives Appropriations and Budget Committee.
F. Notwithstanding subsections A and B of this section, if the
sentencing court orders self-reporting whereby a defendant who poses
a low risk to public safety, as determined by factors including, but
not limited to, the nature of the committed offense, criminal
history, and the defendant’s ties to the community, such defendant
shall be allowed to self-report to a designated Department of
Corrections reception center for commencement of the imprisonment
sentence and bypass detention in a county jail. The defendant shall
schedule a day and a time within five (5) days of sentencing to be
received by the Department and upon arrival, the Department of
Corrections shall process any required documentation and conduct
initial assessments. The sheriff or detention center personnel
shall not be responsible for transportation in such cases and shall
not be eligible for reimbursement as provided in subsection E of
this section. The defendant shall not receive credit for serving
any days outside the county jail or outside the custody of the
Department to include time served, deferred reception credits,
earned credits, and achievement credits. Due to the defendant never
being in custody, the Department shall be directed to contact the
county jail if the defendant fails to arrive at the designated

SB2062 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

rece ption center and shall not be responsible for the management of
locating and placing the defendant into custody.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 04/20/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended.



















SB2062 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.